Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB662.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government,
charter county government, consolidated local government, or unified local
government;
(b) "Low voltage battery-charged security fence":
1. Means a fence that:
a. Is interfaced with an alarm system in a manner that enables the
fence to cause the connected alarm system to transmit a signal
intended to alert the business occupying the property and a
monitoring station operator in response to an intrusion or
burglary;
b. Is energized by a commercial direct current storage battery of
twelve (12) volts or less that is designed to periodically deliver
voltage impulses to the fence;
c. Includes a battery charging device used exclusively to charge the
fence energizer's battery, the energizer of which is certified to
meet the current International Electrotechnical Commission
Standard 60335-2-76 or a successor standard;
d. Is surrounded by a nonelectric perimeter barrier;
e. Is ten (10) feet in height, or two (2) feet higher than the
surrounding nonelectric perimeter barrier, whichever is greater;
and
Page 1 of 2
BR214900.100 - 2149 - XXXX 3/5/2026 2:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2149
f. Has warning signs that read, "WARNING—ELECTRIC
FENCE" or substantially similar language posted on it at
intervals not greater than thirty (30) feet apart for its entire
length; and
2. Does not mean a:
a. Security alarm system that does not attach to a security fence
system capable of delivering an electric pulse; or
b. Low voltage battery-charged security fence surrounding a
property used as or zoned exclusively for residential purposes;
and
(c) "Nonelectric perimeter barrier" means a fence or wall that is at least five
(5) feet in height and not capable of delivering an electric pulse.
(2) A low voltage battery-charged security fence may be installed and operated on
any property that is not used as or exclusively zoned for residential purposes
without the need to obtain any local government permit, approval, or other
authorization, except for an alarm permit when required by a local government.
(3) The authorizations provided in subsection (2) of this section shall not be
interpreted or construed to limit a local government's powers and abilities to
regulate a nonelectric perimeter barrier as it relates to:
(a) Generally applicable safety, building, electrical, and fire codes, including
the Kentucky Building Code and Kentucky Electrical Code; or
(b) Generally applicable setback, height, and lot coverage requirements that
apply uniformly to other fences or accessory structures.
Page 2 of 2
BR214900.100 - 2149 - XXXX 3/5/2026 2:41 PM Jacketed